Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB3.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 205.522 is amended to read as follows:
(1) With respect to the administration and provision of Medicaid benefits pursuant to this chapter, the Department
for Medicaid Services, any managed care organization contracted to provide Medicaid benefits pursuant to this
chapter, and the state's medical assistance program shall be subject to, and comply with, the following, as
applicable:
(a) KRS 304.12-237;
(b) KRS 304.17A-129;
(c)[(b)] KRS 304.17A-145;
(d)[(c)] KRS 304.17A-163 and[;
(d) KRS] 304.17A-1631;
(e) KRS 304.17A-167;
(f) KRS 304.17A-235;
(g) KRS 304.17A-257;
(h) KRS 304.17A-259;
(i) KRS 304.17A-263;
(j) KRS 304.17A-264;
(k) KRS 304.17A-515;
(l) KRS 304.17A-580;
(m) KRS 304.17A-600, 304.17A-603, and 304.17A-607; and
(n) KRS 304.17A-740 to 304.17A-743.
(2) A managed care organization contracted to provide Medicaid benefits pursuant to this chapter shall comply
with the reporting requirements of KRS 304.17A-732.
Section 2. KRS 205.6485 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "KCHIP" means the Kentucky Children's Health Insurance Program.
(2) The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall:
(a) Prepare a state child health plan, known as KCHIP, meeting the requirements of Title XXI of the
Federal Social Security Act, for submission to the Secretary of the United States Department of Health
and Human Services within such time as will permit the state to receive the maximum amounts of
federal matching funds available under Title XXI; and
(b) By administrative regulation promulgated in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, establish the
following:
1. The eligibility criteria for children covered by KCHIP, which shall include a provision that no
person eligible for services under Title XIX of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. secs. 1396 to
1396v, as amended, shall be eligible for services under KCHIP, except to the extent that Title
XIX coverage is expanded by KRS 205.6481 to 205.6495 and KRS 304.17A-340;
2. The schedule of benefits to be covered by KCHIP, which shall:
a. Be at least equivalent to one (1) of the following:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
i. The standard Blue Cross/Blue Shield preferred provider option under the Federal
Employees Health Benefit Plan established by 5 U.S.C. sec. 8903(1);
ii. A mid-range health benefit coverage plan that is offered and generally available to
state employees; or
iii. Health insurance coverage offered by a health maintenance organization that has
the largest insured commercial, non-Medicaid enrollment of covered lives in the
state; and
b. Comply with subsection (6) of this section;
3. The premium contribution per family for health insurance coverage available under KCHIP,
which shall be based:
a. On a six (6) month period; and
b. Upon a sliding scale relating to family income not to exceed:
i. Ten dollars ($10), to be paid by a family with income between one hundred percent
(100%) to one hundred thirty-three percent (133%) of the federal poverty level;
ii. Twenty dollars ($20), to be paid by a family with income between one hundred
thirty-four percent (134%) to one hundred forty-nine percent (149%) of the federal
poverty level; and
iii. One hundred twenty dollars ($120), to be paid by a family with income between
one hundred fifty percent (150%) to two hundred percent (200%) of the federal
poverty level, and which may be made on a partial payment plan of twenty dollars
($20) per month or sixty dollars ($60) per quarter;
4. There shall be no copayments for services provided under KCHIP; and
5. a. The criteria for health services providers and insurers wishing to contract with the
Commonwealth to provide coverage under KCHIP.
b. The cabinet shall provide, in any contracting process for coverage of preventive services,
the opportunity for a public health department to bid on preventive health services to
eligible children within the public health department's service area. A public health
department shall not be disqualified from bidding because the department does not
currently offer all the services required by this section. The criteria shall be set forth in
administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A and shall maximize competition
among the providers and insurers. The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall provide
oversight over contracting policies and procedures to assure that the number of applicants
for contracts is maximized.
(3) Within twelve (12) months of federal approval of the state's Title XXI child health plan, the Cabinet for Health
and Family Services shall assure that a KCHIP program is available to all eligible children in all regions of the
state. If necessary, in order to meet this assurance, the cabinet shall institute its own program.
(4) KCHIP recipients shall have direct access without a referral from any gatekeeper primary care provider to
dentists for covered primary dental services and to optometrists and ophthalmologists for covered primary eye
and vision services.
(5) KCHIP shall comply with:
(a) KRS 304.12-237; and
(b) KRS 304.17A-163 and 304.17A-1631.
(6) The schedule of benefits required under subsection (2)(b)2. of this section shall include:
(a) Preventive services;
(b) Vision services, including glasses;
(c) Dental services, including sealants, extractions, and fillings; and
(d) The coverage required under KRS 304.17A-129 and 304.17A-145.

CHAPTER 99 3
Section 3. If the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or the Department for Medicaid Services
determines that a state plan amendment, waiver, or any other form of authorization or approval from any federal
agency to implement Sections 1 and 2 of this Act is necessary to prevent the loss of federal funds or to comply with
federal law, the cabinet or department:
(1) Shall, within 90 days after the effective date of this section, request the necessary federal authorization
or approval to implement Sections 1 and 2 of this Act; and
(2) May only delay implementation of the provisions of Sections 1 and 2 of this Act for which federal
authorization or approval was deemed necessary until the federal authorization or approval is granted.
Section 4. Sections 1, 2, and 3 of this Act shall constitute the specific authorization required under KRS
205.5372(1).
Signed by Governor April 13, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version